Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.150

Termination of entities—Review under Sunset Act. (Expires June 30, 2025.)

The entities scheduled for termination under this chapter shall be subject to all of the processes provided in this chapter.

[ 2000 c 189 s 10; 1983 1st ex.s. c 27 s 8; 1979 c 99 s 1.]